nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Fiske- og vannutstyr > Akvariefiltre: Eksterne akvariefiltre og beholdere; Hang-On-Back (HOB) akvariefiltre; Interne akvariefiltre; Svampbaserte akvariefiltre; Akvariefiltre under grus
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Artigos aquáticos e para peixes > Filtros para aquários: Filtros externos e em caixa para aquários; Filtros de mochila para aquários; Filtros internos para aquários; Filtros de esponja para aquários; Filtros de fundo para aquários
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Benodigdheden voor vissen en water > Aquariumfilters: Externe en canister-aquariumfilters; Hang-on-back (HOB) aquariumfilters; Interne aquariumfilters; Sponsaquariumfilters; Ondergrondse aquariumfilters
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za ribe i vodeni svijet > Filtri za akvarij: Vanjski i kanister filtri za akvarij; Hang-On-Back (HOB) filtri za akvarij; Unutarnji filtri za akvarij; Spužvasti filtri za akvarij; Podšljunčani filtri za akvarij
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 魚和水族用品 > 水族箱過濾器: 外置式和圓桶水族箱過濾器; 懸掛式水族箱過濾器; 水族箱內部過濾器; 海綿水族箱過濾器; 水族箱底砂過濾器
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για ψάρια & υδρόβια ζώα > Φίλτρα ενυδρείου: Εξωτερικά φίλτρα & φίλτρα ενυδρείου κινητών κάδων; Φίλτρα ενυδρείου Hang-On-Back που βρίσκονται κρεμασμένα στην πίσω όψη (HOB); Εσωτερικά φίλτρα ενυδρείου; Φίλτρα ενυδρείου με σφουγγάρι; Φίλτρα ενυδρείου με χαλίκι
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre rybička a akváriá > Filtre do akvária: Vonkajšie a kanistrové filtre do akvária; Závesné filtre do akvária; Vnútorné filtre do akvária; Špongiovité filtre do akvária; Podštrkové filtre do akvária
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์ทางน้ำและปลา > ตัวกรองสำหรับตู้ปลา: ตัวกรองตู้ปลาภายนอกและแบบถัง; ตัวกรองตู้ปลาแบบแขวนด้านหลัง (HOB); ตัวกรองในตู้ปลา; ตัวกรองตู้ปลาแบบฟองน้ำ; ตัวกรองแบบแผ่นกรองใต้ตู้
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Potřeby pro ryby a vodní živočichy > Filtry do akvárií: Externí a kanystrové akvarijní filtry; Závěsné (HOB - Hang-On-Back) akvarijní filtry; Vnitřní akvarijní filtry; Houbové akvarijní filtry; Podštěrkové akvarijní filtry
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Fish & Aquatic Supplies > Aquarium Filters: External & Canister Aquarium Filters; Hang-On-Back (HOB) Aquarium Filters; Internal Aquarium Filters; Sponge Aquarium Filters; Undergravel Aquarium Filters
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Poissons et fournitures aquatiques > Filtres pour aquariums: Filtres d’aquarium externes et à cartouche; Filtres d’aquarium suspendus (HOB); Filtres internes d’aquarium; Filtres d’aquarium à éponge; Filtres d’aquarium sous gravier
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru pești și acvaristică > Filtre pentru acvariu: Filtre de acvariu externe și cu canistră; Filtre pentru acvariu suspendate în spate (HOB); Filtre interne pentru acvariu; Filtre pentru acvariu cu burete; Filtre pentru acvariu cu pietriș
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Риби и артикули за акваристика > Филтри за аквариум: Външни и канистър филтри; Филтри със задно закачане; Вътрешни филтри; Филтри с гъба; Дънни филтри
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 어류/수족관 용품 > 수족관 필터: 외부/캐니스터 수족관 필터; 배면 걸이식 수족관 필터; 내부 수족관 필터; 스펀지 수족관 필터; 저면 수족관 필터
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za ribe in vodne živali > Filtri za akvarije: Zunanji in notranji filtri za akvarije; Filtri za akvarije za obešanje na hrbet; Notranji filtri za akvarije; Filtrirne pene za akvarije; Potopni filtri za akvarije
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Fisk och vattentillbehör > Akvariefilter: Externt och kanistert akvariefilter; Hang-On-Back (HOB) akvariefilter; Internt akvariefilter; Avampakvariefilter; Undergrusakvariefilter
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły i akcesoria dla rybek > Filtry akwariowe: Filtry akwariowe zewnętrzne i kubełkowe; Wiszące filtry akwariowe (HOB).; Wewnętrzne filtry akwariowe; Filtry gąbkowe do akwarium; Podżwirowe filtry akwariowe
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės žuvims ir kitiems vandens gyvūnams > Akvariumų filtrai: Išoriniai ir kanistriniai akvariumų filtrai; Pakabinami (HOB) akvariumų filtrai; Vidiniai akvariumų filtrai; Kempininiai akvariumų filtrai; Požvirgždiniai akvariumų filtrai
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > 魚・水産用品 > 水槽用フィルター: 水槽用外部フィルター・キャニスターフィルター; 水槽用ハングオンバック（HOB）フィルター; 水槽用内部フィルター; 水槽用スポンジフィルター; 水槽用底面式フィルター
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Balık ve Su Malzemeleri > Akvaryum Filtreleri: Harici ve Kutu Akvaryum Filtreleri; Arkadan Askılı (HOB) Akvaryum Filtreleri; Akvaryum İçi Filtreler; Sünger Akvaryum Filtreleri; Yeraltı Akvaryum Filtreleri
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Forniture ittiche e acquatiche > Filtri per acquari: Filtri per acquari esterni e a contenitore; Filtri per acquari Hang-On-Back (HOB); Filtri interni per acquario; Filtri per acquari in spugna; Filtri per acquari sottosabbia
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Zierfisch- Aquarien- und Teichbedarf > Aquariumfilter: Außen- und Kanisterfilter für Aquarien; Hang-On-Aquariumfilter; Interne Aquariumfilter; Schwamm-Aquariumfilter; Bodenfilter für Aquarien
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Fisk og vandforsyninger > Filtre til akvarium: Eksterne og beholdere – Filtre til akvarium; Hang-On-Back (HOB) – Filtre til akvarium; Interne – Filtre til akvarium; Svampe – Filtre til akvarium; Undergravet – Filtre til akvarium
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho cá & động vật thủy sinh > Thiết bị lọc bể cá: Bộ lọc ngoài & lọc thùng cho bể cá; Bộ lọc thác treo (HOB) cho bể cá; Bộ lọc trong bể; Bộ lọc mút cho bể cá; Bộ lọc đáy cho bể cá
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Hal- és vízi kellékek > Akváriumszűrők: Külső és tartályos akváriumszűrők; Hátul lógó (HOB) akváriumszűrők; Belső akváriumszűrők; Szivacsos akváriumszűrők; Kavics alatti akváriumszűrők
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Товары для рыб и аквариумов > Фильтры для аквариумов: Внешние и канистровые фильтры для аквариумов; Рюкзачные (навесные) фильтры для аквариумов; Внутренние фильтры для аквариумов; Аэрлифтные фильтры (губки) для аквариумов; Донные фильтры для аквариумов
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Peixes e suprimentos aquáticos > Filtros para aquário: Filtros de aquário externos e canister; Filtros de aquário Hang-On-Back (HOB); Filtros internos para aquário; Filtros de esponja para aquário; Filtros de aquário de fundo
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Kala- ja akvaariotarvikkeet > Akvaarion suodattimet: Ulkoiset ja kanisteriakvaariosuodattimet; Takana roikkuvat akvaariosuodattimet; Sisäiset akvaariosuodattimet; Sieniakvaariosuodattimet; Soran alla sijaitsevat akvaariosuodattimet
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Suministros para peces y acuarios > Filtros para acuarios: Filtros de acuario externos y de cesta; Filtros de cascada; Filtros internos para acuarios; Filtros de esponja para acuarios; Filtros de fondo
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 鱼类和水族用品 > 水族箱过滤器: 外置式和筒式水族箱过滤器; 背挂式 (HOB) 水族箱过滤器; 水族箱内部过滤器; 水族箱海绵过滤器; 水族箱底砂过滤器